Massachusetts, session 194th, H1603.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding sections 93 and 94 of chapter 221; section 6 of
chapter211A; sections 53, 58, and 79 of chapter 218; section 35A of chapter 217; section 14 of
chapter 185 and section 9A of chapter 185C, section 28D1/2 of chapter 278 or any other general
or special law or by-law to the contrary, the salaries of the Clerk of the Supreme Judicial Court
for the Commonwealth, the Clerk of the of the Supreme Judicial Court for Suffolk County, the
Clerk of the Appeals Court, the Clerks in the Superior Court, the Clerks of the Boston Municipal
Court; the Clerks in the Juvenile Department; the Clerks in the District Court Department; the
Registers of the Probate and Family Court Department; the Recorder of the Land Court
Department; and the Clerks of the Housing Court Department shall be 84.57 percent of the salary
of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court.
SECTION 2. Section 14 of chapter 185 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 2, “81.57 per cent of the chief justice
of 4

of said department” and inserting in place thereof the following: 84.57 per cent of the Chief
Justice of the supreme judicial court..
SECTION 3. Section 9A of chapter 185C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 3, “81.57 per cent of the chief justice of said department” and
inserting in place thereof the following: 84.57 per cent of the chief justice of the supreme
Judicial Court.
SECTION 4. Section 22 of chapter 211 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 1, the figure “$232,101” and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $252,101.
SECTION 5. Said section 22 of said chapter 211 is hereby further amended by striking
out, in line 2, the figure “$226,187” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
$246,187.
SECTION 6. Section 2 of chapter 211A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 1, the figure “$219,856” and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $239,856.
SECTION 7. Said section 2 of said chapter 211A is hereby further amended by striking
out, in line 2, the figure “$213,924” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
$233,924.
SECTION 8. Section 6 of said chapter 211A is hereby amended by striking out, in line
10, the following: “81.57 per cent of the salary of the chief justice of said court” and inserting in
of 4

place thereof the following:- 84.57 per cent of the salary of the chief justice of the supreme
judicial court.
SECTION 9. Section 4 of chapter 211B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 3, the figure “$207,855” and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $227,855.
SECTION 10. Said section 4 of said chapter 211B is hereby further amended by striking
out, in line 5, the figure “$213,966” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
$233,966.
SECTION 11. Said section 4 of said chapter 211B is hereby further amended by striking
out, in line 7, the figure “$220,160” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
$240,160.
SECTION 12. Section 35A of chapter 217 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out, in line 2, the following: “81.57 per cent of the salary of the chief
justice of the department” and inserting in place thereof the following:- 84.57 per cent of the
salary of the chief justice of the supreme judicial court.
SECTION 13. Section 53 of chapter 218 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 9, the following “81.57 of the salary of the chief justice of the
department” and inserting in place thereof the following: 84.57 per cent of the salary of the chief
justice of the supreme judicial court.
SECTION 14. Section 58 of said chapter 218 is hereby amended by striking out, in line
94, the following “81.57 per cent of the salary of the chief justice of said department” and
of 4

inserting in place thereof the following: 84.57 per cent of the salary of the chief justice of the
supreme judicial court.
SECTION 15. Section 79 of said chapter 218 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 2,
the following: “81.57 per cent of the salary of the chief justice of said department” and inserting
in place thereof the following: 84.57 per cent of the salary of the chief justice of the supreme
judicial court.
SECTION 16. Section 93 of said chapter 221 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 2,
the figure “81.57” and inserting in place thereof the following: 84.57.
SECTION 17. Section 94 of said chapter 221 is hereby amended by striking out, in line
11, the figure “81.57” and inserting in place thereof the following: 84.57.
SECTION 18. Said section 94 of said chapter 221 is hereby further amended by striking
out, in line 20, the following “81.57 per cent of the salary of the chief justice of said department”
and inserting in place thereof the following: 84.57 per cent of the salary of the chief justice of the
supreme judicial court.
SECTION 19. This act shall be effective on of July 1, 2025.
of 4